California statutes. Public Utilities Code
(History: Added by renumbering Section 2821 by Stats. 1980, Ch. 373, Sec. 6.)
-------------------------------------------

2872.

(a) The connection of automatic dialing-announcing devices to a telephone line is subject to this article and to the jurisdiction, control, and regulation of the commission.

(b) A person shall not operate an automatic dialing-announcing device except in accordance with this article. The use of such a device by any person, either individually or acting as an officer, agent, or employee of a person or corporation operating automatic dialing-announcing devices, is subject to this article.

(c) A person shall not operate an automatic dialing-announcing device in this state to place a call that is received by a telephone in this state during the hours between 9 p.m. and 9 a.m. California time.

(d) This article does not prohibit the use of an automatic dialing-announcing device by any person exclusively on behalf of any of the following:

(1) A school for purposes of contacting parents or guardians of pupils regarding attendance or the health or safety of pupils.

(2) An exempt organization under the Corporation Tax Law (Part 11 (commencing with Section 23001) of Division 2 of the Revenue and Taxation Code) for purposes of contacting its members.

(3) A privately owned or publicly owned cable television system for purposes of contacting customers or
 subscribers regarding the previously arranged installation of facilities on the premises of the customer or subscriber.

(4) A privately owned or publicly owned public utility for purposes of contacting customers or subscribers regarding the previously arranged installation of facilities on the premises of the customer or subscriber or for purposes of contacting employees for emergency actions or repairs required for public safety or to restore services.

(5) A petroleum refinery, chemical processing plant, or nuclear powerplant for purposes of advising residents, public service agencies, and the news media in its vicinity of an actual or potential life-threatening emergency.

(e) (1) This article does not prohibit law enforcement agencies, fire protection agencies, public health agencies, public
 environmental health agencies, city or county emergency services planning agencies, or any private for-profit agency operating under contract with, and at the direction of, one or more of these agencies, from placing calls through automatic dialing-announcing devices, if those devices are used for any of the following purposes:

(A) Providing public service information relating to public safety.

(B) Providing information concerning police or fire emergencies.

(C) Providing warnings of impending or threatened emergencies.

(D) Testing all modes of 911 emergency telephone systems, including basic 911 telephone services as described in Section 53107 of the Government Code, enhanced 911 emergency telephone services as described in Section 53119 of the
 Government Code, Next Generation 911 emergency communication systems as described in Section 53121 of the Government Code, and similar 911 technologies, for data accuracy and emergency alert notification system capabilities.

(2) Calls authorized by this subdivision shall not be subject to Section 2874.

(f) This article does not apply to any automatic dialing-announcing device that is not used to randomly or sequentially dial telephone numbers, but that is used solely to transmit a message to an established business associate, customer, or other person having an established relationship with the person using the automatic dialing-announcing device to transmit the message, or to any call generated at the request of the recipient.

(g) The commission may determine any question of fact arising under this
 section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 36, Sec. 1.   (AB 2906)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

2872.5.

The commission, in consultation with the Office of Emergency Services, shall open an investigative proceeding to determine whether standardized notification systems and protocol should be utilized by entities that are authorized to use automatic dialing-announcing devices pursuant to subdivision (e) of Section 2872, to facilitate notification of affected members of the public of local emergencies. The commission shall not establish standards for notification systems or standard notification protocol unless it determines that the benefits of the standards exceed the costs.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 842, Sec. 47.   (SB 1222)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

2873.

Automatic dialing-announcing devices may be used to place calls over telephone lines only pursuant to a prior agreement between the persons involved, whereby the person called has agreed that he or she consents to receive such calls from the person calling, or as specified in Section 2874.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 2823 by Stats. 1980, Ch. 373, Sec. 8.)
-------------------------------------------

2874.

(a) Whenever telephone calls are placed through the use of an automatic dialing-announcing device, the device may be operated only after an unrecorded, natural voice announcement has been made to the person called by the person calling. The announcement shall do all of the following:

(1) State the nature of the call and the name, address, and telephone number of the business or organization being represented, if any.

(2) Inquire as to whether the person called consents to hear the prerecorded message of the person calling.

(3) Inform the person called if the prerecorded message uses an artificial voice.

(b) The person calling, as described in subdivision (a), shall disconnect the automatic dialing-announcing device from the telephone line upon the termination of the call by either the person calling or the person called.

(c) For purposes of this section, both of the following definitions apply:

(1) “Artificial intelligence” means an engineered or machine-based system that varies in its level of autonomy and that can, for explicit or implicit objectives, infer from the input it receives how to generate outputs that can influence physical or virtual environments.

(2) “Artificial voice” means a voice that is generated or significantly altered using artificial intelligence.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 316, Sec. 1.   (AB 2905)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

2875.

No person shall connect any automatic dialing-announcing device to any telephone line without first making written application to the telephone corporation within whose service area telephone calls through the use of such device are proposed to be placed. In such application, the person shall provide information as to the type of automatic dialing-announcing device proposed to be connected, the time of day such telephone calls are proposed to be placed using such device, the anticipated number of calls proposed to be placed during the specified calling period, the average length of a completed call, and such additional information as the corporation or
 the commission may require. Upon receiving such an application for service, the corporation shall review the furnished information and, if it appears that calling patterns would create a traffic overload condition or the service would be detrimental to the services of other customers of the corporation, it may deny the application or modify the application and grant the application as so modified.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 2825 by Stats. 1980, Ch. 373, Sec. 10.)
-------------------------------------------

2875.5.

(a) On and after July 1, 2002, no person operating any automatic equipment that incorporates a storage capability of telephone numbers to be called or a random or sequential number generator capable of producing numbers to be called may make a telephone connection for which no person, acting as an agent or telemarketer, is available for the person called.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), the commission shall establish an acceptable error rate for telephone connections made
 in violation of subdivision (a). The commission shall determine the error rate, if any, before July 1, 2002.

(c) The commission may require any person operating equipment as described in subdivision (a) to maintain records of telephone connections made for which no person, acting as an agent or telemarketer, is available for the person called. The commission may require copies of those records to be submitted to the commission.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 696, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

2876.

Any person violating this article is guilty of a civil offense and is subject to either or both of the following penalties:

(a) A fine of not to exceed five hundred dollars ($500) for each violation, levied and enforced by the commission, on complaint or on its own motion, pursuant to Chapter 11 (commencing with Section 2100) of Part 1.

(b) Disconnection of telephone service to the automatic dialing-announcin g device for a period of time which shall be specified by the commission.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 732, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Customer and Subscriber Services [2881. - 2890.2.]

2881.

(a) The commission shall design and implement a program to provide a telecommunications device capable of serving the needs of individuals who are deaf or hard of hearing, together with a single party line, at no charge additional to the basic exchange rate, to a subscriber who is certified as an individual who is deaf or hard of hearing by a licensed physician and surgeon, audiologist, or a qualified state or federal agency, as determined by the commission, and to a subscriber that is an organization representing individuals who are deaf or hard of hearing, as determined and specified by the commission pursuant to subdivision (h). A licensed hearing aid dispenser may certify the need of an individual to participate in the program if that individual has been previously fitted with an amplified device by the dispenser and the
 dispenser has the individual’s hearing records on file before certification. In addition, a physician assistant or nurse practitioner may certify the needs of an individual who has been diagnosed by a physician and surgeon as being deaf or hard of hearing to participate in the program after reviewing the medical records or copies of the medical records containing that diagnosis.

(b) The commission shall also design and implement a program to provide a dual-party relay system, using third-party intervention to connect individuals who are deaf or hard of hearing and offices of organizations representing individuals who are deaf or hard of hearing, as determined and specified by the commission pursuant to subdivision (h), with persons of normal hearing by way of intercommunications devices for individuals who are deaf or hard of hearing and the telephone system, making available reasonable access of all phases of public telephone service to
 telephone subscribers who are deaf or hard of hearing. In order to make a dual-party relay system that will meet the requirements of individuals who are deaf or hard of hearing available at a reasonable cost, the commission shall initiate an investigation, conduct public hearings to determine the most cost-effective method of providing dual-party relay service to the deaf or hard of hearing when using a telecommunications device, and solicit the advice, counsel, and physical assistance of statewide nonprofit consumer organizations of the deaf, during the development and implementation of the system. The commission shall apply for certification of this program under rules adopted by the Federal Communications Commission pursuant to Section 401 of the federal Americans with Disabilities Act of 1990 (Public Law 101-336).

(c) The commission shall also design and implement a program whereby specialized or supplemental telephone communications
 equipment may be provided to subscribers who are certified to be disabled at no charge additional to the basic exchange rate. The certification, including a statement of visual or medical need for specialized telecommunications equipment, shall be provided by a licensed optometrist, physician and surgeon, physician assistant, or nurse practitioner, acting within the scope of practice of the applicable license, or by a qualified state or federal agency as determined by the commission. The commission shall, in this connection, study the feasibility of, and implement, if determined to be feasible, personal income criteria, in addition to the certification of disability, for determining a subscriber’s eligibility under this subdivision.

(d) (1) The commission shall also design and implement a program to provide access to a speech-generating device to any subscriber who is certified as having a speech disability at no charge
 additional to the basic exchange rate. The certification shall be provided by a licensed physician, licensed speech-language pathologist, nurse practitioner, or qualified state or federal agency. The commission shall provide to a certified subscriber access to a speech-generating device that is all of the following:

(A) A telecommunications device or a device that includes a telecommunications component.

(B) Appropriate to meet the subscriber’s needs for access to, and use of, the telephone network, based on the recommendation of a licensed speech-language pathologist.

(C) Consistent with the quality of speech-generating devices available for purchase in the state.

(2) The commission shall adopt rules to implement this subdivision and subdivision (e) by
 January 1, 2014.

(e) All of the following apply to any device or equipment described in this section that is classified as durable medical equipment under guidelines established by the United States Department of Health and Human Services:

(1) It is the intent of the Legislature that the commission be the provider of last resort and that eligible subscribers first obtain coverage from any available public or private insurance.

(2) The commission may require the subscriber to provide information about coverage for any or all of the cost of the device or equipment that is available from a public or private insurance, the cost to the subscriber of a deductible, copayment, or other relevant expense, and any related benefit cap information.

(3) The total
 cost of a device or equipment provided to a subscriber under this section shall not exceed the rate of reimbursement provided by Medi-Cal for that device or equipment.

(f) This section does not require the commission to provide training to a subscriber on the use of a speech-generating device.

(g) (1) The commission shall administer a surcharge to collect revenues, subject to an annual appropriation of moneys by the Legislature, to allow providers of the equipment and service specified in subdivisions (a) to (d), inclusive, to recover costs as they are incurred under this section. The surcharge shall be in effect until December 31, 2034. The commission shall require that the programs implemented under this section be identified on subscribers’ bills, and shall transfer moneys collected by the commission from the surcharge to the Controller for deposit into the Deaf and Disabled Telecommunications Program Administrative Committee Fund.

(2) The commission may collect a sum not to exceed one hundred million dollars ($100,000,000) per year by imposing the surcharge pursuant to paragraph (1).

(h) The commission shall determine and specify those statewide organizations representing the deaf or hard of hearing that shall receive a telecommunications device pursuant to subdivision (a), or a dual-party relay system pursuant to subdivision (b), or both, and in which offices the equipment shall be installed in the case of an organization having more than one office.

(i) The
 commission may direct a telephone corporation subject to its jurisdiction to comply with its determinations and specifications pursuant to this section.

(j) The commission may make recommendations to the Legislature regarding appropriations from the Deaf and Disabled Telecommunications Program Administrative Committee Fund.

(k) In order to continue to meet the access needs of individuals with functional limitations of hearing, vision, movement, manipulation, speech, and interpretation of information, the commission shall perform an ongoing assessment of, and if appropriate, expand the scope of, the program to allow for additional access capability consistent with evolving telecommunications technology.

(l) The commission shall structure the programs required by this section so that a charge imposed to
 promote the goals of universal service reasonably equals the value of the benefits of universal service to contributing entities and their subscribers.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 19, Sec. 1.   (SB 142)   Effective June 27, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

2881.1.

(a) In addition to the requirements of Section 2881, the commission shall design and implement a program to provide a telecommunications device capable of servicing the needs of the deaf or severely hard of hearing, together with a single party line, at no charge additional to the basic exchange rate, to any subscriber that is an agency of state government and
 that the commission determines serves a significant portion of the deaf or severely hard-of-hearing population, and to an office located in the State Capitol and selected by the Joint Rules Committee, for purposes of access by the deaf or severely hard of hearing to Members of the Legislature.

(b) The commission shall permit providers of equipment and service specified in subdivision (a) to recover costs as they are incurred under this section pursuant to subdivision (g) of Section 2881.

(c) The commission may direct any telephone corporation subject to its jurisdiction to comply with its determinations pursuant to this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 94, Sec. 22.   (AB 1709)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

2881.2.

(a) In addition to the requirements of Section 2881, the commission shall design and implement a program that shall provide for publicly available telecommunications devices capable of servicing the needs of the deaf or hard of hearing in existing buildings, structures, facilities, and public accommodations of the type specified in Section 4450 of the Government Code and Sections 19955.5 and 19956 of the Health and Safety Code, making available reasonable access of all phases of public telephone service to individuals who are deaf or
 hard of hearing. The commission shall direct the appropriate committee under its control to determine and specify locations within existing buildings, structures, facilities, and public accommodations in need of a telecommunications device and to contract for the procurement, installation, and maintenance of these devices. In the letting of the contract, the commission shall direct the committee to ensure consideration of for-profit and nonprofit corporations, including nonprofit corporations with demonstrated service to individuals who are deaf or hard of hearing and whose boards of directors and staff are made up of a majority of those individuals. The commission shall also direct the committee to seek the cooperation of the owners, managers, and tenants of
 the existing buildings, structures, facilities, and public accommodations that have been determined to be in need of a telecommunications device with regard to its installation and maintenance. The commission shall phase in this program over a reasonable period of time, beginning no later than January 1, 1998, giving priority to those existing buildings, structures, facilities, and public accommodations determined by the commission, with the advice and counsel of statewide nonprofit consumer organizations for the deaf, to be of most importance and usefulness to the deaf or hard of hearing.

(b) The commission shall ensure that costs are recovered as they are incurred under this section, including any costs incurred by the owners, managers,
 or tenants of existing buildings, structures, facilities, and public accommodations, and shall use for this purpose the rate recovery mechanism established pursuant to subdivision (g) of Section 2881. The commission shall also establish a fund and require separate accounting for the program implemented under this section and, in addition, shall require that the surcharge used to fund the program not exceed two-hundredths of 1 percent, that it be combined with the surcharge required by subdivision (g) of Section 2881, and that it count toward the limits set by that subdivision. This surcharge shall be in effect
 until January 1, 2006.

(c) “Existing buildings, structures, facilities, and public accommodations,” for purposes of this section, means those buildings, structures, facilities, and public accommodations or parts thereof that were constructed or altered before January 26, 1993, or are otherwise not required by Section 303 of the federal Americans with Disabilities Act of 1990 (P.L. 101-336; 42 U.S.C. Sec. 12183) or any other section of that act and its implementing regulations and guidelines, to have a publicly available telecommunications device capable of serving the needs of the deaf or
 hard of hearing.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 94, Sec. 23.   (AB 1709)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

2881.4.

(a) The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:

(1) Section 278 requires the commission to transfer to the Controller for deposit in the Deaf and Disabled Telecommunications Program Administrative Committee Fund all revenues collected by telephone corporations to fund programs to provide specified telecommunications services and equipment to deaf, disabled, and hard-of-hearing persons, as specified in Sections 2881, 2881.1, and 2881.2.

(2) The commission issued a report to the Legislature in May 2001, addressing compliance issues pertaining to the programs specified in Sections 2881, 2881.1, and 2881.2, including a recommendation to secure legislative authorization for the commission to
 contract with outside entities for the provision of services and equipment mandated by Sections 2881, 2881.1, and 2881.2.

(3) The telecommunications services and equipment provided to deaf, disabled, and hard-of-hearing individuals and their families, as specified in Sections 2881, 2881.1, and 2881.2, are of such a highly specialized and technical nature that the necessary expert knowledge, ability, and experience are not available within the current state civil service system.

(4) It is the intent of the Legislature, in enacting this section, to do all of the following:

(A) Maintain the availability of the state’s current statewide infrastructure of telecommunications services and equipment to deaf, disabled, and hard-of-hearing persons, as provided for in Sections 2881, 2881.1, and 2881.2, as essential to
 maintaining public health and safety.

(B) Authorize the commission to enter into contracts for the provision of telecommunications services and equipment for deaf, disabled, and hard-of-hearing persons in a manner that protects and enhances the current statewide infrastructure and coordinated delivery of those services and equipment and includes a priority for maintaining long-term continuity of program administration and maximum involvement of the deaf and disabled community in program governance.

(C) Strengthen program priorities for expanded outreach through continuing consultation with, and participation by, the deaf, disabled, and hard-of-hearing community in order to ensure the state’s network of services reach hard-to-serve populations, including rural, inner-city, and urban areas.

(D) Develop a mechanism to
 achieve cost-effective and timely deployment of new and emerging telecommunications technologies, to the extent fiscally and economically feasible.

(b) In order for the commission to ensure continued provision of telecommunications services and equipment for deaf, disabled, and hard-of-hearing persons, the commission, subject to annual appropriation of funds by the Legislature and consistent with state contracting requirements, may contract with entities, including nonprofit entities, or persons that have the necessary expert knowledge, ability, and experience to provide, manage, or operate the programs described in Sections 2881, 2881.1, and 2881.2.

(c) The commission may enter into contracts pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 19130 of the Government Code for the services and equipment contemplated by the programs described in Sections 2881, 2881.1, and 2881.2.

(d) The commission may include provisions that accomplish any of the following in contracts authorized by this section:

(1) Establish standards and procedures, including prior commission approval, for subcontracting.

(2) Establish standards and procedures regarding personnel and accounting practices.

(3) Require budget approval.

(4) Require periodic audits.

(5) Monitor performance and establish performance standards and the method of evaluating performance, including remedies for unsatisfactory performance.

(6) Establish standards and procedures to investigate and
 resolve complaints.

(7) Provide for any other terms or restrictions as the commission finds necessary to ensure that the public funds are used in accordance with the goals of the Legislature and the commission.

(e) Notwithstanding any other law, a contract entered into pursuant to this section may provide for periodic advance payments for telecommunications services to be performed or telecommunications equipment to be provided. An advance payment made pursuant to this section shall not exceed 25 percent of the total annual contract amount.

(f) Any contractor the commission selects shall demonstrate knowledge of and the capacity to provide specialized telecommunications services and equipment to deaf, disabled, and hard-of-hearing persons, and shall be required to consult with the Telecommunications Access for Deaf
 and Disabled Administrative Committee regarding the specialized needs of individuals using program services and equipment, as specified in Sections 2881, 2881.1, and 2881.2.

(g) The commission shall, to the extent feasible and consistent with state civil service requirements, employ staff overseeing the programs described in Sections 2881, 2881.1, and 2881.2 who are members of the deaf, disabled, and hard-of-hearing community.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 561, Sec. 219.   (AB 1516)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

2883.

(a) (1) The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:

(A) As originally enacted, Section 2883 required local telephone corporations to provide a residential telephone connection with no customer account attached, also known as a warm line, access to “911” emergency service. This section took effect in 1995 when
 basic local exchange telephone service was provided exclusively by incumbent wireline providers operating within their franchise territories. Local exchange competition was nonexistent and wireless telephones were expensive and not in widespread use.

(B) At that time, the number of warm lines was very small. The practice of leaving warm lines in place continued the availability of “911” emergency service upon disconnection and permitted new residential service orders to be completed with minimum cost and delay.

(C) In recent years, the providers of warm line service have lost a significant percentage of their customer base to competitors. Today, the number of warm lines in California has increased in proportion to the loss of wireline customers. An estimated 2,000,000 warm lines exist today and that number continues to grow.

(D) Rather than being converted to new active service accounts, many warm lines remain in place indefinitely, even when customers switch to other voice carriers that provide “911” emergency service access. As warm lines age, deterioration can create shorts in these lines that trigger “911” calls, also known as phantom “911” calls because there is no person making the call.

(E) Responding to phantom “911” calls places a drain on public safety resources including increased costs for public safety responders. In addition, the state pays providers on a monthly basis, based on volume, to maintain number and location records in the state “911” database, including the records for increasing numbers of warm lines.

(F) The cost to local telephone companies to energize and maintain warm lines is the same as for active service accounts. Energy provided to warm lines at
 residences where access to “911” emergency service is being obtained through a different provider is a waste of limited natural resources.

(2) It is the intent of the Legislature to amend Section 2883 in a manner that continues to provide a public safety net in a competitive telecommunications market, eliminates phantom “911” calls, conserves energy for productive uses, and limits costs to the state, local governments, and local telephone corporations.

(b) All local telephone corporations, excluding providers of mobile telephony service and mobile satellite telephone service, as defined in Section 224.4, to the extent permitted by existing technology or facilities, shall provide every subscriber of tariffed residential basic exchange service with access to “911” emergency service.

(c) A local telephone corporation
 shall provide access to services described in subdivision (b) for at least 120 days after disconnection of residential basic exchange service for nonpayment of any delinquent account or indebtedness owed by the subscriber to the telephone corporation. A subscriber and a telephone corporation may arrange payment schedules to regain full service.

(d) If a local telephone corporation chooses to terminate access to the services described in subdivision (b) after 120 days as authorized in subdivision (c), the local telephone corporation shall inform residential subscribers as part of the notice of suspension or disconnection of service for nonpayment of all of the following information:

(1) The availability of the “911” emergency service described in subdivision (b) for 120 days after disconnection of residential basic exchange service.

(2) Options that may be available to avoid suspension or disconnection of service.

(3) Other options that may be available for obtaining access to “911” emergency service consistent with a customer education program, if adopted by the commission.

(e) This section shall not be construed to relieve any person of an obligation to pay a debt owed to a telephone corporation.

(f) This section shall not require a local telephone corporation to provide “911” access pursuant to this section if doing so would preclude providing service to subscribers of residential telephone service.

(g) A local telephone corporation may disconnect any line in existence on January 1, 2011, providing access to “911”
 emergency services with no customer account attached for that line, if notice of not less than 90 days prior to disconnection is provided to the last known address of record associated with that line that is being disconnected. The notice shall provide information about all of the following:

(1) “911” emergency service is provided to customers who purchase voice telephone service.

(2) Access to “911” emergency services may have been provided to the address, to the extent permitted by existing technology or facilities, but will be discontinued as provided in this section.

(3) A contact number for further information, including information about low cost options, including the Universal Lifeline Telephone Service (ULTS) program.

(4) Contact information
 for the commission.

(h) A local telephone corporation shall not be required to terminate access to any line providing access to “911” emergency services with no customer account attached for that line.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 332, Sec. 1.   (SB 1375)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

2884.

(a) The commission shall, pursuant to its existing authority, by rule or order, establish procedures governing telephone corporation billing practices and operations to require every telephone corporation, on and after July 1, 1986, or on and after another date or dates which the commission finds and determines to be appropriate and feasible with respect to the capability of particular telephone equipment, to offer residential subscribers the option of deleting access to a class of information-access telephone service, commonly referred to as “900 or 976 service,” whereby recorded commercial, informational, or
 public service messages, interactive computer programs, and other services, are provided for a charge, in addition to the basic local exchange charge, to the person calling, and to notify new residential subscribers of the options available to delete information-access services through telephone service. 

The commission shall specify a method or methods for telephone corporations to institute this deletion of access option for residential subscribers, taking into consideration the operational requirements of the various types of telephone equipment in use throughout the state. The commission shall impose no charge on residential telephone subscribers for this deletion of access option, and shall require telephone corporations to refund to subscribers any amounts paid prior to the effective date of the amendments to this section enacted in 1988 for deletion of access. The commission shall determine and implement a method by which telephone corporations shall be
 recompensed for the expenses of providing this deletion of access option. 

(b) The commission shall require every telephone corporation which furnishes information-access telephone service to make available a separate, easily distinguishable telephone prefix number for information providers which provide messages which constitute harmful matter and for those who provide other than messages which constitute harmful matter, and to request every information provider to designate which prefix corresponds to the type of messages it proposes to provide. Any information provider which provides any live or recorded message constituting harmful matter through any information-access telephone number other than one within the prefix assigned to information providers furnishing messages constituting harmful matter is in violation of Section 2111. The commission shall require the telephone corporation to offer residential subscribers the option of deleting
 access to the telephone prefix number by which messages constituting harmful matter are accessed, pursuant to subdivision (a), and shall determine and implement a method by which a telephone corporation shall be recompensed for the expenses of providing this deletion of access option to residential subscribers. 

(c) As used in this section, “harmful matter” means harmful matter as defined in subdivision (a) of Section 313 of the Penal Code. 

(d) If any provision of this section or the application thereof to any person or circumstances is held invalid, that invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications of the section which can be given effect without the invalid provision or application, and to this end the provisions of this section are severable.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 297, Sec. 1.   Effective August 1, 1991.)
-------------------------------------------

2884.2.

(a) Except as specified in subdivision (b), the billing and collection practices of a telephone corporation for services rendered to or for an information service that contains harmful matter, as defined in subdivision (a) of Section 313 of the Penal Code, are not subject to the jurisdiction and control of the commission, notwithstanding Section 2884, but are a matter for contractual arrangement between the telephone corporation
 and the information provider.

(b) Nothing in subdivision (a) affects the commission’s jurisdiction over billing and collection for any other information service.

(c) The commission may, on complaint or on its own motion, after a hearing, find and determine that circumstances including, but not limited to, anticompetitive results, require the exercise of jurisdiction and control by it over those matters removed from its jurisdiction and control by subdivision (a), and may then exercise that jurisdiction and control. 

(d) Subdivision (a) applies only to that class of information-access telephone service furnished within or between service areas, as defined in Section 230.3, through the use of either a “976” prefix or a “900” access code telephone number, and applies only to billing and collection services in that class
 of service. 

(e) The commission may investigate and consider, for purposes of establishing telephone rates, revenues and expenses related to any billing or collection services rendered by a telephone corporation to or for an information provider.

(f) A telephone corporation shall, before refusing to provide billing and collection services for any information service, give the information provider of that service and the commission not less than 30 days’ advance notice.

(g) If a telephone corporation elects to enter into a contractual arrangement to provide billing and collection services to an information provider, the telephone corporation shall provide those services to the information provider under the same terms, conditions, and rates that the service is offered to all other information providers contracting for
 the services. The telephone corporation shall provide copies of the contracts to the commission and, on request, to any other interested party. 

(h) Notwithstanding Section 17024 of the Business and Professions Code, billing and collection services described in subdivision (a) are services subject to Part 2 (commencing with Section 16600) of Division 7 of that code. A person or firm claiming a violation of Section 17045 of that code, with respect to those services, may proceed in accordance with Article 4 (commencing with Section 17070) of Chapter 4 of Part 2 of Division 7 of that code, or pursue any other remedy available under law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 170, Sec. 1.   Effective July 24, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

2884.5.

Notwithstanding Section 2884, the commission shall require that telephone subscriber access to information services providing messages which constitute harmful matter, as defined in Section 313 of the Penal Code, be furnished by an information provider or its agent on a subscription basis only.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 567, Sec. 1.   Effective August 26, 1988.)
-------------------------------------------

2884.6.

(a) The commission shall require telephone corporations and providers of information-access telephone services to institute a method of handling subscriber complaints concerning these services, which shall include provision for a waiver of all of the charges for these services for a first occasion of their inadvertent or mistaken use.

(b) Every telephone corporation and provider of information-access telephone services providing messages that constitute harmful matter, as